Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-626
Criminal possession of a financial transaction forgery device; penalty.

(1) A person commits the offense of criminal possession of a financial transaction forgery device if (a) such person possesses any tool, photographic equipment, printing equipment, or any other device or group or combination of devices adapted, designed, or commonly used for committing or facilitating the commission of an offense involving the unauthorized manufacturing, printing, embossing, or magnetic encoding of a financial transaction device or the altering or addition of any service marks or holographic images to a financial transaction device and (b) intends to use the device or devices possessed or knows that some person intends to use the device or devices possessed in the commission of such an offense.

(2) Any person committing the offense of criminal possession of a financial transaction forgery device shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.

Laws 1989, LB 372, § 10;

Laws 2016, LB1094, § 9.